District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.15

Jurisdiction.

An offense under this subchapter shall be deemed to be committed in the District of Columbia, regardless of whether the offender is physically present in the District of Columbia, if:

(1)

The insured, insurer, claimant, or applicant is a resident of, or located in, the District of Columbia;

(2)

A District of Columbia address is used on an application, policy, or claim for payment or benefit;

(3)

The services for which a claim is made were provided or alleged to have been provided in the District of Columbia;

(4)

Payment of a claim or benefit was made or was to be made to an address in the District of Columbia;

(5)

The loss occurred or is alleged to have occurred in the District of Columbia; or

(6)

Any part of the offense takes place in the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125o
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(h), 56 DCR 7413

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102(g) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 214(h) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 214(h) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).